ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.aff
# rule/flag 1187 (affects 69693 words, has 222 subrules):
flag l:
	U D	>	-D,TE
	U D	>	-D,TEGI
	O G A	>	-GA,DEGA
	O G A	>	-GA,DEGAGI
	O G A	>	-GA,DEKS
	O G A	>	-GA,DEKSKI
	O G A	>	-GA,DEL
	O G A	>	-GA,DELE
	O G A	>	-GA,DELEGI
	O G A	>	-GA,DELGI
	O G A	>	-GA,DELT
	O G A	>	-GA,DELTKI
	O G A	>	-GA,DENA
	O G A	>	-GA,DENAGI
	O G A	>	-GA,DENI
	O G A	>	-GA,DENIGI
	O G A	>	-GA,DES
	O G A	>	-GA,DESKI
	O G A	>	-GA,DESSE
	O G A	>	-GA,DESSEGI
	O G A	>	-GA,DEST
	O G A	>	-GA,DESTKI
	O G A	>	-GA,DETA
	O G A	>	-GA,DETAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,KS
	E G A	>	-GA,KSKI
	I G A	>	-GA,L
	I G A	>	-GA,LE
	E G A	>	-GA,LEGI
	E G A	>	-GA,LGI
	I G A	>	-GA,LT
	E G A	>	-GA,LTKI
	A G A	>	-GA,M
	A G A	>	-GA,MA
	A G A	>	-GA,MAD
	A G A	>	-GA,MADKI
	A G A	>	-GA,MAGA
	A G A	>	-GA,MAGAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,MAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,MAID
	A G A	>	-GA,MAIDKI
	A G A	>	-GA,MAIGA
	A G A	>	-GA,MAIGAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,MAIKS
	A G A	>	-GA,MAIKSKI
	A G A	>	-GA,MAIL
	A G A	>	-GA,MAILE
	A G A	>	-GA,MAILEGI
	A G A	>	-GA,MAILGI
	A G A	>	-GA,MAILT
	A G A	>	-GA,MAILTKI
	A G A	>	-GA,MAINA
	A G A	>	-GA,MAINAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,MAINI
	A G A	>	-GA,MAINIGI
	A G A	>	-GA,MAIS
	A G A	>	-GA,MAISKI
	A G A	>	-GA,MAISSE
	A G A	>	-GA,MAISSEGI
	A G A	>	-GA,MAIST
	A G A	>	-GA,MAISTKI
	A G A	>	-GA,MAITA
	A G A	>	-GA,MAITAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,MAKS
	A G A	>	-GA,MAKSKI
	A G A	>	-GA,MAL
	A G A	>	-GA,MALE
	A G A	>	-GA,MALEGI
	A G A	>	-GA,MALGI
	A G A	>	-GA,MALT
	A G A	>	-GA,MALTKI
	A G A	>	-GA,MANA
	A G A	>	-GA,MANAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,MANI
	A G A	>	-GA,MANIGI
	A G A	>	-GA,MAS
	A G A	>	-GA,MASKI
	A G A	>	-GA,MASSE
	A G A	>	-GA,MASSEGI
	A G A	>	-GA,MAST
	A G A	>	-GA,MASTKI
	A G A	>	-GA,MAT
	A G A	>	-GA,MATA
	A G A	>	-GA,MATAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,MATE
	A G A	>	-GA,MATEGA
	A G A	>	-GA,MATEGAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,MATEGI
	A G A	>	-GA,MATEKS
	A G A	>	-GA,MATEKSKI
	A G A	>	-GA,MATEL
	A G A	>	-GA,MATELE
	A G A	>	-GA,MATELEGI
	A G A	>	-GA,MATELGI
	A G A	>	-GA,MATELT
	A G A	>	-GA,MATELTKI
	A G A	>	-GA,MATENA
	A G A	>	-GA,MATENAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,MATENI
	A G A	>	-GA,MATENIGI
	A G A	>	-GA,MATES
	A G A	>	-GA,MATESKI
	A G A	>	-GA,MATESSE
	A G A	>	-GA,MATESSEGI
	A G A	>	-GA,MATEST
	A G A	>	-GA,MATESTKI
	A G A	>	-GA,MATETA
	A G A	>	-GA,MATETAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,MATKI
	A G A	>	-GA,MGI
	I G A	>	-GA,NA
	E G A	>	-GA,NAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,NI
	E G A	>	-GA,NIGI
	I G A	>	-GA,S
	U G A	>	-GA,SE
	U G A	>	-GA,SED
	U G A	>	-GA,SEDKI
	U G A	>	-GA,SEGA
	U G A	>	-GA,SEGAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SEID
	U G A	>	-GA,SEIDKI
	U G A	>	-GA,SEIGA
	U G A	>	-GA,SEIGAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SEIKS
	U G A	>	-GA,SEIKSKI
	U G A	>	-GA,SEIL
	U G A	>	-GA,SEILE
	U G A	>	-GA,SEILEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SEILGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SEILT
	U G A	>	-GA,SEILTKI
	U G A	>	-GA,SEINA
	U G A	>	-GA,SEINAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SEINI
	U G A	>	-GA,SEINIGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SEIS
	U G A	>	-GA,SEISKI
	U G A	>	-GA,SEISSE
	U G A	>	-GA,SEISSEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SEIST
	U G A	>	-GA,SEISTKI
	U G A	>	-GA,SEITA
	U G A	>	-GA,SEITAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SEKS
	U G A	>	-GA,SEKSKI
	U G A	>	-GA,SEL
	U G A	>	-GA,SELE
	U G A	>	-GA,SELEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SELGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SELT
	U G A	>	-GA,SELTKI
	U G A	>	-GA,SENA
	U G A	>	-GA,SENAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SENI
	U G A	>	-GA,SENIGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SES
	U G A	>	-GA,SESKI
	U G A	>	-GA,SESSE
	U G A	>	-GA,SESSEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SEST
	U G A	>	-GA,SESTKI
	U G A	>	-GA,SETA
	U G A	>	-GA,SETAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SI
	O G A	>	-GA,SID
	O G A	>	-GA,SIDKI
	U G A	>	-GA,SIGA
	U G A	>	-GA,SIGAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SIGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SIKS
	U G A	>	-GA,SIKSKI
	U G A	>	-GA,SIL
	U G A	>	-GA,SILE
	U G A	>	-GA,SILEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SILGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SILT
	U G A	>	-GA,SILTKI
	U G A	>	-GA,SINA
	U G A	>	-GA,SINAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SINI
	U G A	>	-GA,SINIGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SIS
	U G A	>	-GA,SISKI
	U G A	>	-GA,SISSE
	U G A	>	-GA,SISSEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SIST
	U G A	>	-GA,SISTKI
	U G A	>	-GA,SITA
	U G A	>	-GA,SITAGI
	E G A	>	-GA,SKI
	I G A	>	-GA,SSE
	E G A	>	-GA,SSEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,ST
	U G A	>	-GA,STE
	U G A	>	-GA,STEGA
	U G A	>	-GA,STEGAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,STEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,STEKS
	U G A	>	-GA,STEKSKI
	U G A	>	-GA,STEL
	U G A	>	-GA,STELE
	U G A	>	-GA,STELEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,STELGI
	U G A	>	-GA,STELT
	U G A	>	-GA,STELTKI
	U G A	>	-GA,STENA
	U G A	>	-GA,STENAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,STENI
	U G A	>	-GA,STENIGI
	U G A	>	-GA,STES
	U G A	>	-GA,STESKI
	U G A	>	-GA,STESSE
	U G A	>	-GA,STESSEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,STEST
	U G A	>	-GA,STESTKI
	U G A	>	-GA,STETA
	U G A	>	-GA,STETAGI
	E G A	>	-GA,STKI
	I G A	>	-GA,TA
	E G A	>	-GA,TAGI

# rule/flag 1278 (affects 55378 words, has 39 subrules):
flag m:
	U D	>	-D,VAT
	E G A	>	-GA,KS
	U G A	>	-GA,KSKI
	U G A	>	-GA,LEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,LGI
	U G A	>	-GA,LTKI
	E G A	>	-GA,NA
	U G A	>	-GA,NAGI
	E G A	>	-GA,NI
	U G A	>	-GA,NIGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SKI
	U G A	>	-GA,SSEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,STKI
	E G A	>	-GA,TA
	U G A	>	-GA,TAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,TE
	A G A	>	-GA,TEGA
	I G A	>	-GA,TEGAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,TEGI
	A G A	>	-GA,TEKS
	I G A	>	-GA,TEKSKI
	A G A	>	-GA,TEL
	A G A	>	-GA,TELE
	I G A	>	-GA,TELEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,TELGI
	A G A	>	-GA,TELT
	I G A	>	-GA,TELTKI
	A G A	>	-GA,TENA
	I G A	>	-GA,TENAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,TENI
	I G A	>	-GA,TENIGI
	A G A	>	-GA,TES
	I G A	>	-GA,TESKI
	A G A	>	-GA,TESSE
	I G A	>	-GA,TESSEGI
	A G A	>	-GA,TEST
	I G A	>	-GA,TESTKI
	A G A	>	-GA,TETA
	I G A	>	-GA,TETAGI
