ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.dict
adeniidega/almn
adõgeelasega/abehiklmny
agentidega/almny
ahuga/acdeghimy
ainestikulisustega/almny
akusatiivsusega/abehklmny
akuudiga/aceijly
alkoholisiga/ajlny
alpiinsustega/almny
amfiibega/almny
anapestilisega/abdhjlmny
andilasega/abhilmny
antraktiga/acefijkly
antropoidsusega/abehklmny
apteegega/almn
arglematuga/abcdefgkmoy
armeelasiga/ajly
arvestuslikuga/acdegjlmy
asemega/abcefhiklmny
astronoomilistega/almny
asundiga/abcehijlmoy
auklikega/ajlmny
autokraadega/almn
aşuursusiga/ajly
basaarega/almny
batsillilisiga/ajlny
biskviidega/almn
boheemlaslikega/ajlmny
brikkidega/almny
daativiga/abcehijlmoy
dargega/almny
deminutiivsusega/abehklmny
deposiidega/almn
diagnoosega/almny
dilemmalisega/abdhjlmny
dioptrilisusiga/ajly
doktorantuurega/almny
donkihhotlikkudega/almny
düspeptilisiga/ajlny
eelnevustega/almny
efektiivsustega/almny
ekskurssidega/almny
ekslevaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
ekvipotentsiaalsustega/almny
elektroodilisega/abdhjlmny
emigrandega/almn
ennatuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
epeega/abghilmny
erkjustega/almny
erksusega/abehiklmny
etendanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
eugeenilistega/almny
faktoloogilisiga/ajlny
fenoloogilisustega/almny
fetiğiga/abcehijlmoy
foiniiklastega/almny
fonoloogiaga/abcdefgikmnoy
frantsisklasiga/ajly
föderatiivsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
galaktilisustega/almny
gestaapolasiga/ajly
giljotiinega/almny
grillinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
haagitanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hagelusega/abhilmny
haldjalikkudega/almny
hallitusesiga/ajlny
hariduslikuga/acdegjlmy
haritavustega/almny
hegelianismiga/acefijkly
heinasega/abdehjklmnoy
helklevusiga/ajly
hemoglobinuuriaga/abcdefgikmnoy
hieroglüüfilisiga/ajlny
hingatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hirnatusiga/ajly
hookusega/abehklmny
hoolitsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
humalasusega/abehklmny
humanistega/almny
hämmetanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
härrandlikkudega/almny
hõljuvusega/abehklmny
hõõrelnud/acdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hüütuga/abcdefgijklmnoy
idüllilisusiga/ajly
ikoonega/almny
imperialismega/almny
impotentsusega/abehiklmny
inkvisitsioonilistega/almny
intellektuaalsusiga/ajly
irdsusega/abehklmny
jaatavusiga/ajly
jahedusega/abehiklmny
joodeldusega/abhilmny
jopiga/aceijly
jumalikega/ajlmny
jändamisega/abhlmny
jäneslikuga/acdegjlmy
jõllitsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kaamega/abcdefhjklmnoy
kaarustega/almny
kahetisusega/abehklmny
kaigastega/almny
kaldega/abehiklmny
kamraadlikuga/acdegjlmy
kanadalasega/abhilmny
kapseljusega/abehklmny
kariga/acefijkly
kartellilisusega/abehklmny
kategoorilisustega/almny
katkestamatuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
keebjustega/almny
kehalikuga/acdegjlmy
kekustega/almny
kestnud/acdfhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kibestusiga/ajly
kiiksatusega/abhilmny
killega/abghilmny
killustikkudega/almny
kiristustega/almny
kitsidusega/abhilmny
kiustikuga/acdegimy
kloriidega/almny
klõpsanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kogunemistega/almny
kokainismega/almny
kolaskiga/abcehijlmoy
kombineega/abghilmny
kommünikeega/abghilmny
konditsionaalsusega/abehklmny
konstitutsiooniga/acefijkly
kontrahtidega/almny
koorikuga/abcdefgikmoy
kooslustega/almny
korpuselisusega/abehklmny
kossutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kraaklemisega/abhlmny
kriiskavustega/almny
kriuksatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kräunatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kukkedega/almny
kulaklikuga/acdegjlmy
kuppavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
kursilisiga/ajlny
kuujustega/almny
käharustega/almny
kähmlustega/almny
kärsaklasega/abhilmny
kõdunenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kõhnemusega/abehklmny
kõpsatustega/almny
kõvakusiga/ajly
köietustega/almny
künklikkudega/almny
küübestustega/almny
labidjusega/abehklmny
lahutavaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
lahvardiga/abcehijlmoy
lampinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
larüngoskoobega/almn
lauga/acdegimy
lehelisustega/almny
lehtsustega/almny
lenkstangega/almny
liftiga/acefijkly
lihasjustega/almny
liivasusega/abehklmny
lineaarsusiga/ajly
litoraalsustega/almny
lokslemisega/abhlmny
lombardiga/abcefhijklmoy
lootusetustega/almny
lumistega/almny
lurbituga/abcdefgijklmnoy
lämmustega/almny
lõhastunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lõikamisega/abhlmny
lödisustega/almny
löövetega/almny
maalisustega/almny
maistega/almny
maitsmisega/abehiklmny
manöövriga/abcehijlmoy
marodeerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
matsega/almny
meisterlikkustega/almny
meloodilistega/almny
mihukesustega/almny
miljonendaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
modaalsusega/abehiklmny
mootorilisusega/abehklmny
moskvalasega/abhilmny
munejaga/abcdefgijklmnoy
murenevusega/abehiklmny
muutega/abehiklmny
märuleiga/acejl
mätlikuga/acdegjlmy
mügarlikega/ajlmny
mürgituga/abcdefgjklmnoy
napusiga/ajly
neermisustega/almny
niiskumusiga/ajly
nomograafilisega/abdhjlmny
norulisega/abdhjlmny
näilisusega/abehiklmny
näljasusega/abehklmny
nööristikega/almny
nüansega/almn
olmega/abcefhiklmny
ookeanilistega/almny
orogeensustega/almny
paatkondadega/almny
paikesusiga/ajly
palvustega/almny
pankrotiga/aceijly
pastoreiga/acejl
patriarhaalsusega/abehklmny
pelglikega/ajlmny
perutusega/abhilmny
piielnud/acdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
pilkasustega/almny
pingutatusega/abehiklmny
pleekjaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
pletiga/aceijly
poolikusiga/ajly
porbulasega/abhilmny
pretendeerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
prognostilisusega/abehklmny
protokollilisusega/abehklmny
puhuriga/abcehijlmoy
pukslevustega/almny
puutumusiga/ajly
puändega/almn
põlgusiga/ajly
põrgetega/almny
raamiga/acefijkly
rahanduslikuga/acdegjlmy
raolisiga/ajlny
reastusega/abehiklmny
regulaatoriga/abcehijlmoy
retseptoriga/abcehijlmoy
retsidiivsusega/abehklmny
risoidsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
robedusega/abehklmny
ropsega/almny
rutulisustega/almny
rääsega/almny
rühmanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
saariga/ajly
salmilisusega/abehklmny
sametiga/abcehijlmoy
seerialisusega/abehklmny
seguga/acdeghimy
sensuaalsusiga/ajly
setukaga/abcdefgikmnoy
siirdlasega/abehiklmny
sirgustega/almny
sitkestustega/almny
sombususega/abehklmny
sombususiga/ajly
spellimisega/abehiklmny
staadiumilisega/abdhjlmny
strontsiumeiga/acejl
suktsessioonega/almny
sumpavusega/abehklmny
sälgitamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
särklasega/abehiklmny
söömiga/ajly
sööstlikkudega/almny
süüdistatavusiga/ajly
tadşikkidega/almny
taktitustega/almny
taotelnud/abcdfghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tasemelisusiga/ajly
teistlikuga/acdegjlmy
telepaatilisega/abdhjlmny
tihkestustega/almny
tiikidega/almny
toimkondadega/almny
tolvaniga/abcehijlmoy
tossikesusiga/ajly
treidjunionismega/almny
troofilisega/abdhjlmny
tuhatnikuga/acdegimy
tuhmjaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
turnüürega/almny
turvetega/almny
tärkamistega/almny
tõlluga/acem
töntsega/almny
tüsistusega/abhilmny
uidetuga/abcdefgijklmnoy
usaldatavusega/abehklmny
uudistega/almny
vaibutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vaigukusega/abehklmny
vapiga/aceijly
varbituga/abcdefgijklmnoy
veerlemisega/abhlmny
venitanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vihavusega/abehklmny
viitsinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vilkusega/abehiklmny
vitaalsusega/abehiklmny
voldilistega/almny
väldetega/almny
välgatelnud/abcdfghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
võimutsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
võltsega/almny
ähmastanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ärtuga/abcdeghimy
õhendustega/almny
õrnakusega/abehklmny
üheksandikega/almny
